Hawaii statutes.
PART VI.
ASSISTING UTILITIES SERVING THE GENERAL

PUBLIC IN
PROVIDING ELECTRIC ENERGY, GAS,

OR
TELECOMMUNICATIONS

Note

Part heading amended by L 2012, c 242, §1.

§39A-191 Definitions. Whenever used in
this part, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:

"Department" means the department of
budget and finance.

"Energy project" means any facilities
for each single project or multiproject program of a project party, including a
publicly owned energy cooperative, which is certified by the public utilities
commission as being for the local furnishing of electric energy or gas;
provided that any new generating unit for the production or generation of
electric energy from fossil fuels shall not be considered an energy project for
purposes of this part unless specifically authorized in any act providing for
the authorization of the issuance of bonds pursuant to this part.

"Local furnishing of electric energy or
gas" means providing property or land that is or will be:

(1) Depreciable property or land;

(2) Used to produce, collect, generate, transmit,
store, distribute, or convey electric energy or gas, including without
limitation, air or water pollution control facilities;

(3) Used in the trade or business of furnishing
electric energy or gas; and

(4) Part of a system providing service to the general
public of not more than two contiguous counties in the State.

"Project" means any energy project or
telecommunications project.

"Project agreement" means any
agreement entered into under this part by the department with the project party
for the financing from the proceeds of special purpose revenue bonds of a
telecommunications project or an energy project, including without limitation
any loan agreement.

"Project party" means an electric or
gas utility, including a publicly owned energy cooperative, serving the general
public and that is regulated by the public utilities commission under chapter
269, or a telecommunications carrier or telecommunications common carrier,
whether or not subject to regulation by the public utilities commission under
chapter 269.

"Special purpose revenue bonds" or
"bonds" mean bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness issued
pursuant to this part.

"Telecommunications carrier" or
"telecommunications common carrier" has the meaning defined by
section 269‑1.

"Telecommunications project" means
any facilities for each single project or multiproject program for the
provision of telecommunications service of a project party that is a
telecommunications carrier or a telecommunications common carrier.

"Telecommunications service" has the
meaning defined by section 269-1. [L 1981, c 151, pt of §2; am L 2012, c
242, §2; am L 2016, c 98, §2]

Revision Note

Definitions rearranged.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next